Hawaii, session 2026, HB2088.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 578-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsections (a) and (b) to read as follows: "(a)  Persons required to consent to adoption.  Unless consent is not required or is dispensed with under subsection (c), a petition to adopt a child may be granted only if written consent to the proposed adoption has been notarized by a notary public in this or any other jurisdiction and executed by: (1)  The birthing parent of the child; (2)  A legal non-birthing parent to whom the child is a legitimate child; (3)  An adjudicated non-birthing parent whose relationship to the child has been determined by a court; (4)  A presumed non-birthing parent under subsection (d); (5)  A concerned natural non-birthing parent who is not the legal, adjudicated, or presumed non-birthing parent but who has demonstrated a reasonable degree of interest, concern, or responsibility as to the welfare of a child, either: (A)  During the first thirty days after the child's birth; (B)  Before the execution of a valid consent by the birthing parent of the child; or (C)  Before the placement of the child with adoptive parents; whichever period of time is greater; (6)  Any person or agency having legal custody of the child or legally empowered to consent; (7)  The court having jurisdiction of the custody of the child, if the legal guardian or legal custodian of the person of the child is not empowered to consent to adoption; and (8)  The child to be adopted if the child is more than ten years of age, unless the court, in the best interest of the child, dispenses with the child's consent. (b)  A petition to adopt an adult may be granted only if written consent to adoption has been notarized by a notary public in this or any other jurisdiction and executed by the adult and the adult's spouse, if the adult is married." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ By Request